Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,152
Nail technology school; operating requirements.

In order to maintain its license in good standing, each nail technology school shall operate in accordance with the following requirements:

(1) The school shall at all times comply with all applicable provisions of the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act and all rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under such act;

(2) The school owner or owners or their authorized agent shall notify the department at least thirty days prior to any change of ownership, name, or address, and at least sixty days prior to closure, except in emergency circumstances as determined by the department;

(3) No school shall permit anyone other than a nail technology student, nail technology student instructor, or nail technology instructor to perform any of the practices of nail technology within its confines or employment, except that such restriction shall not prevent a school from inviting guest educators who are not licensed to provide education to students or student instructors if the guest educator does not perform any of the practices of nail technology;

(4) The school shall display a name upon or near the entrance door designating it as a nail technology school;

(5) The school shall display in a conspicuous place within the clinic area a sign reading: All services in this school are performed by students who are training in nail technology. A notice to such effect shall also appear in all advertising conducted by the school for its clinic services;

(6) The school shall permit any duly authorized agent of the department to conduct an operation inspection or investigation at any time during the normal operating hours of the school without prior notice, and the owner or manager shall assist the inspector by providing access to all areas of the school, all personnel, and all records requested by the inspector;

(7) The school shall display in a conspicuous place the following records:

(a) The current license to operate a nail technology school;

(b) The current licenses of all persons licensed under the act, except students, employed by or working in the school; and

(c) The rating sheet from the most recent accreditation inspection;

(8) At no time shall a school enroll more students than permitted by the act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;

(9) The school shall not knowingly permit its students, employees, or clients to use, consume, serve, or in any other manner possess or distribute intoxicating beverages or controlled substances upon its premises;

(10) No nail technology instructor or nail technology student instructor shall perform, and no school shall permit such person to perform, any of the practices of nail technology on the public in a nail technology school other than that part of the practical work which pertains directly to the teaching of practical subjects to nail technology students or nail technology student instructors, and complete nail technology services shall not be provided for a client unless done in a demonstration class of theoretical or practical studies;

(11) The school shall maintain space, staff, library, teaching apparatus, and equipment as established by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;

(12) The school shall keep a daily record of the attendance and clinical performance of each student and student instructor;

(13) The school shall maintain regular class and instructor hours and shall require the minimum curriculum;

(14) The school shall establish and maintain criteria and standards for student grading, evaluation, and performance and shall award a certificate or diploma to a student only upon completing a full course of study in compliance with such standards, except that no student shall receive such certificate or diploma until he or she has satisfied or made an agreement with the school to satisfy all outstanding financial obligations to the school;

(15) The school shall maintain on file the enrollment of each student; and

(16) The school shall print and provide to each student a copy of the school rules, which shall not be inconsistent with the act or with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under such act and which shall include policies of the school with respect to tuition, reimbursement, conduct, attendance, grading, earning of hours and credits, demerits, penalties, dismissal, graduation requirements, dress, and other information sufficient to advise the student of the standards he or she will be required to maintain. The department may review any school's rules to determine their consistency with the intent and content of the act and the rules and regulations and may overturn any school rules found not to be in accord.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 72;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,223;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 414;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 54.